Oklahoma, session 2026, SB716.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 11 O.S. 2021, Section 50-109, as
last amended by Section 3, Chapter 357, O.S.L. 2024 (11 O.S. Supp.
2025, Section 50-109), is amended to read as follows:
Section 50-109. Any municipality participating in the Oklahoma
Police Pension and Retirement System shall appropriate funds, for
the use and benefit of the System, as provided in the following
schedule:
1. Prior to July 1, 1991, a minimum of ten percent (10%) of the
actual paid base salary of each member of the System employed by the
municipality;
2. Beginning July 1, 1991, a minimum of ten and one-half
percent (10 1/2%) of the actual paid base salary of each member of
the System employed by the municipality;
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB716 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

RBS No. 1602
3. Beginning July 1, 1992, a minimum of eleven percent (11%) of
the actual paid base salary of each member of the System employed by
the municipality;
4. Beginning July 1, 1993, a minimum of eleven and one-half
percent (11 1/2%) of the actual paid base salary of each member of
the System employed by the municipality;
5. Beginning July 1, 1994, a minimum of twelve percent (12%) of
the actual paid base salary of each member of the System employed by
the municipality;
6. Beginning July 1, 1995, a minimum of twelve and one-half
percent (12 1/2%) of the actual paid base salary of each member of
the System employed by the municipality;
7. Beginning July 1, 1996, a minimum of thirteen percent (13%)
of the actual paid base salary of each member of the System employed
by the municipality; and
8. Beginning on the effective date of this act July 1, 2025, a
minimum of fourteen percent (14%) sixteen percent (16%) of the
actual paid base salary of each member of the System employed by the
municipality.
The sum appropriated shall be paid online to the System within
ten (10) days following the payroll period on which the contribution
is based.
The state shall make such appropriation as is necessary to
assure the retirement benefits provided by the article.
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB716 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

RBS No. 1602
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON RETIREMENT AND GOVERNMENT
RESOURCES
February 17, 2026 - DO PASS AS AMENDED BY CS

















SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB716 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)